Illinois, session 104th, SB3029.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Home Repair and Remodeling Act is amended 5by changing Section 18 as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 513/18)7    Sec. 18. Repairs following damaging weather.8    (a) As used in this Section, "catastrophe" means a natural 9occurrence, including but not limited to flood, drought, 10earthquake, tornado, windstorm, or hailstorm, which damages or 11destroys more than one residence.12    (b) A contractor offering home repair or remodeling 13services shall not advertise or promise to pay or rebate all or 14any portion of any insurance deductible as an inducement to 15the sale of goods or services. As used in this Section, a 16promise to pay or rebate includes granting any allowance or 17offering any discount against the fees to be charged or paying 18the insured or any person directly or indirectly associated 19with the property any form of compensation.20    (c) A contractor offering home repair or remodeling 21services shall not accept money or any form of compensation in 22exchange for allowing an out of area contractor to use its 23business name or license.  SB3029 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 20369 SPS 33824 b1    (c-5) A contractor offering home repair or remodeling 2services shall not propose to contract or solicit a contract 3for home repair or remodeling services:4        (1) while a loss-producing occurrence is continuing at 5    the premises;6        (2) while the fire department or emergency personnel 7    are engaged at the damaged premises; or8        (3) between the hours of 7:00 p.m. and 8:00 a.m.9    This subsection does not apply if the proposal to contract 10or solicitation to contract is initiated by a consumer. 11    The requirements of this subsection do not supersede 12regulations adopted by units of local government.13    (c-10) In addition to the provisions of subsection (c-5), 14for a minimum of 72 hours after a disaster proclamation issued 15by the Governor under Section 7 of the Illinois Emergency 16Management Agency Act, to allow for the duties that may be 17necessary to promote and secure the safety and protection of 18the civilian population, a contractor shall not, in person, 19propose to contract or solicit a contract with a consumer for 20home repair or remodeling services, unless the proposal to 21contract or the solicitation to contract is initiated by a 22consumer.23    (d) A contractor offering home repair or remodeling 24services shall include its Illinois State roofing contractor 25license name and number as it appears on its Illinois State 26roofing license on all contracts, bids, and advertisements   SB3029 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 20369 SPS 33824 b1involving roofing work as required by the Illinois Roofing 2Industry Licensing Act.3    (e) A person who has entered into a written contract with a 4contractor offering home repair or remodeling services to 5provide goods or services to be paid from the proceeds of a 6property and casualty insurance policy may cancel the contract 7prior to midnight on the earlier of the fifth business day 8after the insured has received written notice from the insurer 9that all or any part of the claim or contract is not a covered 10loss under the insurance policy or the thirtieth business day 11after receipt of a properly executed proof of loss by the 12insurer from the insured. Cancellation is evidenced by the 13insured giving written notice of cancellation to the 14contractor offering home repair or remodeling services at the 15address stated in the contract. Notice of cancellation, if 16given by mail, is effective upon deposit into the United 17States mail, postage prepaid and properly addressed to the 18contractor. Notice of cancellation may be given by delivering 19or mailing a signed and dated copy of the written notice of 20cancellation to the contractor's business address as stated in 21the contract. Notice of cancellation shall include a copy of 22the written notice from the insurer to the effect that all or 23part of the claim is not a covered loss under the insurance 24policy. Notice of cancellation need not take a particular form 25and is sufficient if it indicates, by any form of written 26expression, the intention of the insured not to be bound by the   SB3029 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 20369 SPS 33824 b1contract.2    (f) Any contract referred to in subsection (e), must 3contain a statement in at least 10 point boldface, in 4substantially the following form: 5        "You may cancel this contract at any time before 6        midnight on the earlier of the fifth business day 7        after you have received written notification from your 8        insurer that all or any part of the claim or contract 9        is not a covered loss under the insurance policy or the 10        thirtieth business day after your insurer has received 11        properly executed proof(s) of loss from you. See 12        attached notice of cancellation form for an 13        explanation of this right." 14    (g) Upon executing a contract referred to in subsection 15(e), furnish each insured a fully completed form in duplicate, 16captioned "NOTICE OF CANCELLATION", which shall be attached to 17the contract but easily detachable, and which shall contain 18boldface type of a minimum size of 10 points the following 19statement with the appropriate fields completed by the 20contractor: 21"NOTICE OF CANCELLATION 22            If you are notified by your insurer that all or any 23        part of the claim or contract is not a covered loss 24        under the insurance policy, you may cancel the 25        contract by mailing or delivering a signed and dated 26        copy of this cancellation notice or any other written   SB3029 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 20369 SPS 33824 b1        notice to (name of contractor) at (address of 2        contractor's place of business) at any time prior to 3        midnight on the earlier of the fifth business day 4        after you have received such notice from your insurer 5        or the thirtieth business day after your insurer has 6        received properly executed proof(s) of loss from you. 7        If you cancel, any payments made by you under the 8        contract, other than payments for goods or services 9        related to a catastrophe which you agreed in writing 10        to be necessary to prevent damage to your property, 11        will be returned to you within 10 business days 12        following receipt by the contractor of your 13        cancellation notice.14            I HEREBY CANCEL THIS TRANSACTION15            ................................16            (date)17            ................................18            (insured's signature)". 19    (h) Within 10 days after a contract referred to in 20subsection (e) has been cancelled, the contractor offering 21home repair or remodeling services shall tender to the insured 22any payments, partial payments, or deposits made by the 23insured and any note or other evidence of indebtedness. If, 24however, the contractor has provided any goods or services 25related to a catastrophe, acknowledged and agreed to by the 26insured in writing to be necessary to prevent damage to the   SB3029 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 20369 SPS 33824 b1premises, the contractor is entitled to the reasonable value 2of such goods and services. Any provision in a contract 3referred to in subsection (e) that requires the payment of any 4fee for anything except goods or services related to a 5catastrophe shall not be enforceable against any insured who 6has cancelled a contract pursuant to this Section.7    (i) A contractor offering home repair or remodeling 8services shall not represent, or offer or advertise to 9represent, on behalf of a homeowner on any insurance claim in 10connection with the repair or replacement of roof systems, or 11the performance of any other interior or exterior repair, 12replacement, construction or reconstruction work; or otherwise 13violate the Public Adjusters Law (Public Act 96-1332). A 14Public Adjuster means any person who acts on behalf of the 15insured in preparing and adjusting a claim for loss or damage 16covered by an insurance contract. A contractor offering home 17repair or remodeling services shall not call in or file a claim 18to an insurance carrier on the insured's behalf. A contractor 19offering home repair or remodeling services shall not climb on 20a roof or inspect for exterior damage without the insured's 21express permission. Nothing in this subsection shall be 22construed to prohibit a residential contractor from: (1) 23providing an insured an estimate for repair, replacement, 24construction, or reconstruction of the insured's property and 25any such estimate may be submitted to the insured's insurance 26company; (2) conferring with an insurance company's   SB3029 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 20369 SPS 33824 b1representative about damage to an insured's property; or (3) 2discussing repair or replacement options with an insurance 3company's representative or the insured about options for the 4repair or replacement of the damage.5(Source: P.A. 97-235, eff. 1-1-12.)